Louisiana, session 2026, SB120.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3703(A)(2), (G), and (K)(1) are hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
§3703. Intercollegiate athlete's compensation and rights; responsibilities of
postsecondary education institutions
A. An intercollegiate athlete at a postsecondary education institution may
earn compensation for the use of the athlete's name, image, or likeness subject to the
following:
* * *
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a postsecondary institution
or an officer, director, employee, or agent of the institution may participate in name,
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-279 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 120
image, and likeness endeavors directly and in support of intercollegiate athletes
pursuant to Paragraph (1) of this Subsection Section.

* * *
G. An intercollegiate athlete's contract for compensation for the use of the
athlete's name, image, or likeness shall not violate the provisions of this Chapter or
any other provision of law to the contrary.
* * *
K.(1) A postsecondary education institution shall provide annual financial
literacy and life skills training for a minimum of two three and one-half hours.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.